California statutes. Water Code
The bylaws in their original form, together with the approval of the board of supervisors and the resolution of the directors adopting them, or together with the written assent thereto, and any repeal or amendment of, or addition to, the bylaws, together with the written assent thereto or a memorandum of the returns of the election at which the assent was given, shall be certified by a majority of the directors and the secretary and recorded with the county recorder of each affected county. Until so recorded, no bylaw, addition thereto, or amendment or repeal thereof can be enforced against any person not having actual notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 51.)
-------------------------------------------

35307.

A district may destroy a record pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 60200) of Division 1 of Title 6 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers [35400. - 35509.]



  ARTICLE 1. Powers Generally [35400. - 35413.]

35400.

Each district has the power generally to perform all acts necessary or proper to carry out fully the provisions of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35401.

A district may acquire, plan, construct, maintain, improve, operate, and keep in repair the necessary works for the production, storage, transmission, and distribution of water for irrigation, domestic, industrial, and municipal purposes, and any drainage or reclamation works connected therewith or incidental thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1329.)
-------------------------------------------

35402.

A district shall not contract for the construction of irrigation works nor construct the irrigation works by employees of the district, if the cost of the construction is paid out of the proceeds of bonds of the district, until an election has been held to determine whether or not the bonds shall be issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35403.

A district may contract to perform and perform any agreement for the transfer or delivery pursuant to Chapter 5 of this part of any irrigation system, canals, rights of way, or other property owned or acquired by the district in exchange for the right to receive and use water or a water supply to be furnished to the district by the other party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35404.

A district may enter for the purposes of the district upon any land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35405.

A district may take conveyances, contracts, leases, or other assurances for property acquired by the district pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35406.

(a) A district may execute, by its president and secretary, all contracts and other documents necessary to carry out the powers and purposes of the district.

(b) The board of a district may delegate and redelegate to officers and employees of the district, under the conditions and restrictions as shall be determined by the board, the power to bind the district by contract and execute contracts on behalf of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 269, Sec. 41.   (SB 184)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

35407.

A district may commence and maintain any actions and proceedings to carry out its purposes or protect its interests and may defend any action or proceeding brought against it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35408.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, compromise and assume the costs of any action or proceeding involving or affecting the ownership or use of waters or water rights within the district used or useful for any purpose of the district or a benefit to any land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

35409.

A district may commence, maintain, intervene in, defend and compromise actions and proceedings to prevent interference with or diminution of the natural flow of any stream or natural subterranean supply of waters which may:

(a) Be used or be useful for any purpose of the district;

(b) Be of common benefit to the land or its inhabitants; or

(c) Endanger the inhabitants or land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 681.)
-------------------------------------------

35410.

The board of a district whose corporate area, in whole or in part, is included within a metropolitan water district may in any fiscal year declare its intention to pay out of its district funds the whole or a stated percentage of the amount of taxes to be derived from the area of such metropolitan water district within the district as such amount of taxes shall be fixed in the next succeeding fiscal year by resolution of the board of directors of such metropolitan water district. District receipts from any source, including assessments, acreage assessments and standby charges, may be used to pay said metropolitan tax. A district may provide for the levy, collection and enforcement of any district or improvement district assessment, acreage assessment or standby charge for the payment of said metropolitan water district tax in the same manner as other district or improvement district assessments and standby charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

35410.1.

In addition to and as an alternative procedure to the levy and collection of assessments and standby charges, a district may fix and collect acreage assessments in an amount determined by the board for each acre of land and for parcels less than one acre within a district or improvement district. These acreage assessments shall be levied only for the payment of the whole or any part of a metropolitan water district tax. The resolution fixing the acreage assessment shall be adopted by the board only after adoption of a resolution setting forth the schedule of such acreage assessments proposed to be established and after notice and hearing in the form and manner prescribed by the board. The acreage assessment shall be levied, collected and enforced in the same manner as provided in Article 4 (commencing with Section 35470) of this chapter for standby charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

35410.2.

If there is more than one tax code area for the levy of said metropolitan water district tax within a district, an improvement district may be formed in the manner provided in Chapter 4.9 (commencing at Section 36410), of Part 6 of this division for any or all of said tax code areas for the purpose of providing for the payment of the whole or part of the metropolitan water district tax attributable to any tax code area. After the hearing on the resolution of intention as provided in Section 36415, or as said hearing may be continued, the board may by resolution order the improvement district formed. Thereafter in any year the board may elect to pay, from receipts, assessments or standby charges or any combination thereof levied exclusively in said improvement district, the whole or a stated percentage of the metropolitan tax for the next succeeding fiscal year attributable to the area within said improvement district, provided, that it takes similar action with respect to all other said tax code areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

35411.

A district may disseminate information to the public concerning the rights, properties, and activities of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 330.)
-------------------------------------------

35412.

The Irish Beach Water District may acquire, construct, and operate facilities for providing fire protection to the district and its inhabitants, including buildings, engines, hose, hose carts, or carriages, and other appliances and supplies for the full equipment of a fire company or department.

The Irish Beach Water District for the purpose of providing fire protection services may exercise any of the powers, functions, and duties which are vested in, or imposed upon, a fire protection district pursuant to the Fire Protection District Law of 1987, Part 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 12 of the Health and Safety Code.

If the district includes any part of a city, fire protection district, or other local agency which provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, or if the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection provides fire protection service to any territory in the district, the district shall have no authority pursuant to this section regarding the prevention and suppression of fires in these territories, unless the district has obtained the consent of the city, fire protection district, other local agency, or the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

The provisions of this section are necessary because of the great need for fire protection services within the area of the Irish Beach Water District. There is no other local governmental entity willing to provide this service to the people of the district. This problem is not common to all districts formed under this division. It is therefore hereby declared that a general law cannot be made applicable and that the enactment of this section as a special law is necessary for the solution of problems existing in the Irish Beach Water District.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1013, Sec. 19.)
-------------------------------------------

35413.

(a) In order to enforce the provisions of any ordinance of the district, including an ordinance fixing charges for the furnishing of commodities or services, or to enforce any district rule or regulation adopted by the board of directors pursuant to Section 35421 or 35423 pertaining to the sale or distribution of water, the district may correct any violation of an ordinance of the district or of the rule or regulation. The district may also petition the superior court for the issuance of a preliminary or permanent injunction, or both, as may be appropriate, restraining any person from the continued violation of any ordinance, rule, or regulation, of the district or for the issuance of an order stopping or disconnecting a service if the charges for that service are unpaid at the time specified in the ordinance, rule, or regulation.

(b) The district may enter upon the private property of any person within the jurisdiction of the district in order to investigate possible violations of an ordinance of the district or law, rule, or regulation described in subdivision (a). The investigation shall be made with the consent of the owner or tenant of the property or, if consent is refused, with a warrant duly issued pursuant to the procedures set forth in Title 13 (commencing with Section 1822.50) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, except that, notwithstanding Section 1822.52 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the warrant shall be issued only upon probable cause.

(c) The district shall notify the county or city building inspector, county health inspector, or other affected county or city employee or office, in writing, within a reasonable time if an actual violation of a district, city, or county ordinance is discovered during the investigation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 798, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Water Distribution [35420. - 35429.]

35420.

All water distributed for irrigation purposes, except as otherwise provided in this article, shall be apportioned ratably to each holder of title to land upon the basis of the ratio which the last assessment against his land for district purposes bears to the whole sum assessed in the district for district purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35421.

Water sold to holders of title to land pursuant to Section 35470 shall be apportioned ratably to each holder of title to land making application therefor under such rules and regulations as the board may from time to time establish.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35422.

Where revenue bonds have been issued payable from revenues to be derived from the sale of water for the irrigation of land all water distributed for irrigation purposes shall be apportioned ratably to each holder of title to land making application therefor pursuant to rules and regulations established by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35422.5.

As an alternative, and in addition, to other methods set forth in this article regarding the apportionment of water, a district may enter into long-term water service contracts with the holders of title to land for the apportionment of all or any part of its water supply. Long-term water service contracts may provide that all water charges provided for, when due, are a lien on the land in the nature of assessments and may be collected and enforced in the manner provided in this division for the collection and enforcement of assessments. Any lien pursuant to this section has the same force, effect, and priority as an assessment lien, if the contract is recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the land is located.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 667, Sec. 14.   Effective September 20, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

35423.

A district may establish, print, and distribute equitable rules and regulations for the sale and distribution of water. A district may provide therein that water shall not be furnished to (1) persons who violate the rules and regulations or against whom there are delinquent water, standby, facility, or other charges, or penalties or interest on any such charges, or (2) land against which there is a delinquent assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 287, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

35424.

After equitable rules and regulations for the distribution of water have been published once a week for two weeks in a newspaper of general circulation published in each affected county, any violation thereof is a misdemeanor and the violator shall, upon conviction thereof, be subject to a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not more than two hundred dollars ($200). When equitable rules and regulations for the distribution of water are amended, the district may publish a summary of the amendments to the rules and regulations with an Internet address and a physical location where the complete text of the amended rules and regulations may be viewed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 38.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

35425.

If its board deems it to be for the best interests of the district, a district may enter into a contract for the lease, sale, or use of any surplus water not then necessary for use within the district, for use either within or without the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35427.

Nothing in this article authorizes the sale of any water right.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35428.

No right in any water or water right owned by the district shall be acquired by use permitted under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35429.

The board may grant to the owner or lessee of a right to the use of any water permission to store the water in any reservoir of the district or to carry it through any conduit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 393, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Applications for Water [35450. - 35455.]

35450.

A district may fix and change a date prior to which applications for water for the ensuing irrigation season are to be received for all crops, or for annual crops and new plantings, and may require a cash deposit to be made at the time of application for each acre for which application is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35451.

The action of a district fixing or changing any date prior to which applications for water are to be received is ineffective until notice of the date is given by publication once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper published in the office county. The date fixed is effective for each year thereafter unless changed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35452.

The cash deposit shall, in the discretion of the board, be forfeited as to each acre not using the water applied for if the district has a sufficient supply of water available at the time the water is to be used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35453.

In the event of water shortage the district may, with respect to the shortage area, give preference to or serve only the land for which application was filed prior to the application date fixed and the land for which no application was required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35454.

If the available water is inadequate to serve all of the land as to which applications for water are filed pursuant to Section 35450, the district may require the owners of land which is proposed to be planted to annual crops or to new plantings to take a proportionate percentage reduction in the water they would normally use thereon and may require the owners of land which is planted to permanent crops to take a reasonable proportionate percentage reduction in the water they would normally use in an amount not exceeding the percentage reduction required of plantings to annual crops and new plantings.

The provisions of this section shall be effective only if more than one-half of the district’s revenue for that year will be derived from charges made for the sale of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35454.5.

In any year in which the board of a district not having meters or other volumetric measuring instruments or facilities to measure substantially all agricultural water to be delivered concludes the available water supply will be inadequate to serve all land entitled to service that will probably desire such service, the district may establish reasonable annual water requirements for growing each type of crop grown or likely to be grown in the district in that year; determine the maximum acreage of each crop that each holder of title to land, or his duly authorized agent or tenant, may irrigate with district water by dividing the quantity of water apportioned or apportionable to him by such reasonable annual water requirements so established by the district; limit the acreage of each crop that each such holder of title to land, or his duly authorized agent or tenant, may irrigate with district water to the maximum acreage or acreages so determined; and refuse to deliver water to, or assess penalities on, a holder of title to land, or his duly authorized agent or tenant, who uses district water on a greater acreage of such crops.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit or limit the application of the provisions of Section 35453 or 35454. This section provides a means of measuring the allocation of water to lands based on the type of crop grown and does not authorize a district to designate the crops to be grown on such land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 78.)
-------------------------------------------

35455.

Nothing in this article restricts or limits existing powers of a district to control and provide for distribution of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Charges [35470. - 35482.]

35470.

Any district formed on or after July 30, 1917, may, in lieu in whole or in part of raising money for district purposes by assessment, make water available to the holders of title to land or the occupants thereon, and may fix and collect charges therefor. Pursuant to the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code, the charges may include standby charges to holders of title to land to which water may be made available, whether the water is actually used or not. The charges may vary in different months and in different localities of the district to correspond to the cost and value of the service, and the district may use so much of the proceeds of the charges as may be necessary to defray the ordinary operation or maintenance expenses of the district and for any other lawful district purpose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35470.1.

If the procedures set forth in this article as it read at the time a standby charge was established were followed, the district may, by resolution, continue the charge pursuant to this article in successive years at the same rate. If new, increased, or extended assessments are proposed, the board shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 27, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

35470.5.

The district may, by resolution, provide that a penalty not in excess of 10 percent shall be added to water, standby, facility, or other charges which are delinquent, and the delinquent charges shall bear interest at a rate not in excess of 112 percent per month. For purposes of this section, the district shall establish the period or date after which the charges shall become delinquent if they remain unpaid. The delinquency dates established in Part 7 (commencing with Section 36550) and Part 7.5 (commencing with Section 37200) for unpaid assessments, which may include standby or other charges for the use of district water that has been made a part of the assessment, shall not apply to the addition of penalties and interest to delinquent charges, pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 7.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

35471.

Any funds derived pursuant to Section 35470 in excess of the amount necessary for operating or maintenance expenses and other lawful district purposes shall be applied by the treasurer upon the payment of interest on general obligation bonds or to create a sinking fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1044.)
-------------------------------------------

35472.

For the purpose of providing funds to pay revenue bonds and interest when due the board shall fix and collect charges for the sale of water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35473.

The charges to pay revenue bonds and interest thereon when due shall be fixed by the board before April 1st of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35474.

The charges to pay revenue bonds and interest thereon shall be fixed by the board upon a flat rate per acre or connection or on a metered basis or on a combination of a flat rate and metered basis and shall be sufficient to raise the amount specified on the face of the bonds when issued and one year’s interest thereon unless the district has accumulated a surplus fund in the treasury of the district which is available for the payment of all bonds and interest that will accrue for payment during the current year, in which event the charges may be made so that the aggregate amount to be raised by the sale of water when added to the surplus fund equals the face value of the bonds that will mature within one year and the interest thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 2.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35475.

The charges to pay revenue bonds and interest thereon may include a stand-by or carrying charge notwithstanding the water is not actually used, under such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35476.

The charges to pay revenue bonds and interest thereon may be made payable in advance before service of water is made to the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35477.

The collection of charges to pay revenue bonds and interest thereon shall be continued each year until all revenue bonds, together with interest thereon, are fully redeemed and paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 390.)
-------------------------------------------

35478.

All revenue bond redemption and interest charges are a first lien on all revenues received from the sale of water unless the district, by a limitation clearly expressed in the ballots used at the election at which the bonds are voted and in all the bonds, limits the charge and lien to a part of the revenues of the district or to a fixed portion of all revenues from the sale and use of water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 6, Sec. 3.   Effective February 4, 1980.)
-------------------------------------------

35479.

The district may elect, if it is using the alternative provisions for levy, collection and enforcement of district assessments by the county as provided in Part 7.5 hereof, to have the county levy and collect standby charges. If the district so elects, it shall certify to the county auditor of each county in which the district is located and the county assessor in each county in which the district is located on or before the fourth Monday in August of each year in which a standby charge is to be levied and collected for the fiscal year commencing on that July 1, the following information for purposes of such levy, assessment and collection:

(a) The amount of the acreage standby charge levied by the district, both by acre and total amount estimated to be collected for the entire district;

(b) The assessee parcels and assessee names for each parcel of land in the district against whom a standby charge is being levied and the acreage assessed to such person according to the district records, and the total amount of the charge to be paid by each assessee parcel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 357.)
-------------------------------------------

35480.

The county assessor and county auditor shall thereafter add to the tax bills for each assessee and assessee parcel as so certified, in addition to the other charges, the standby charges of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

35481.

The county tax collector and treasurer shall thereupon collect, receive and disburse to the district the standby charges as collected with the regular tax payments to the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

35482.

No district furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The district may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sewers [35500. - 35509.]

35500.

A district may acquire, construct, operate, and furnish facilities and services, within or without the district, for the collection, treatment, and disposal of sewage, waste, and storm water and may contract with any persons, firms, public or private corporations or public agencies or other users concerning facilities and services for said purposes. The district may only furnish such services outside the district by means of facilities designed primarily to serve inside the district. Before a district may so furnish such services without the district and within the boundaries of another district or a municipality which has the same or similar powers, including a California water district, with respect to such facilities and services, it shall secure the consent of the governing body of such other district or municipality to do so. This section, to the extent it relates to service outside the district, shall only apply in the case of California water districts where two California water districts are contiguous to each other.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

35501.

The district may prescribe, revise, and collect rates or other charges for the services and facilities furnished pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 351.)
-------------------------------------------

35502.

The district may provide that such rates or other charges may be collected with the water rates of the district and that all rates shall be billed upon the same bill and collected as one item, and that in the event of failure to pay the whole or any part thereof, the district may discontinue any and all service for which such bill is rendered, but this provision shall not be construed to prohibit the collection of rates or charges by the district in any other lawful manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 351.)
-------------------------------------------

35503.

Upon providing a sewer system in any area of the district, the district may declare the further maintenance or use of cesspools, septic tanks, or other local means of sewage disposal in such area to be a public nuisance and may require all buildings used by human beings to be connected with the sewer system within such period, not less than 120 days from the completion of the sewer system, as may be prescribed by the district; provided that such buildings to be connected are within 150 feet of the system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 351.)
-------------------------------------------

35504.

A district may not exercise any of the powers granted a district by this article unless the board first submits to the voters of the district at an election a proposition as to whether or not the powers may be exercised by the district and a majority of the votes cast on the proposition are in favor of the proposition. Such proposition may be submitted at, or at an election consolidated with, the election at which a proposition to issue bonds of the district, or for an improvement district therein, for the purposes specified in this article is submitted. A proposition to issue bonds of the district, or for an improvement district therein, for the purposes specified in this article which has been submitted at, or at an election consolidated with, an election under this section before the effective date of the amendment of this section enacted at the 1964 First Extraordinary Session of the Legislature is hereby ratified and confirmed and any bonds authorized at said election may be issued as legal obligations of the district or improvement district. Only one election need be held to authorize a district to exercise any of the powers granted by this article or any later amendments thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

35504.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 35504, a district may exercise the powers granted a district by this article after a hearing by the board on the question of whether or not the district shall exercise any or all the powers granted by this article. Notice of such hearing shall be given in the manner specified in Section 36254. At the time of the hearing, the board shall hear all interested persons and receive any written protests by any owner of property within the district. Protests shall be made in the manner provided in Section 36255. The board shall not exercise any of the powers granted by this article if a majority written protest is filed against the exercise of such powers. Whether or not a majority protest is made shall be determined in the manner provided in Section 36256.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1458.)
-------------------------------------------

35505.

If 75 percent or more of the territory of one or more county sanitation districts is located within the boundaries of a California water district situated in one county, the board of supervisors of the county, or the governing body of the county sanitation district or districts, may, if the board of directors of the California water district gives its consent in writing, delegate the powers and functions of the governing bodies of the county sanitation districts to the board of directors of the California water district, which shall thereafter perform such powers and functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1153.)
-------------------------------------------

35506.

In order to carry out the powers and purposes granted under this article a district may exercise or use any of the powers or procedures otherwise granted to a district under this division to the extent such powers or procedures may be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

35507.

The powers or procedures referred to in Section 35506 shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following: bonds pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35950) of Part 6, Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36150) of Part 6 and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 36300) of Part 6; warrants pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 36400) of Part 6; formation of improvement districts and bonds therefor pursuant to Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) of Part 6 and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 36450) of Part 6; eminent domain pursuant to Article 2 of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 35625) of Part 5; and contracts with other agencies pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 35850) of Part 5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

35508.

The powers or procedures referred to in Section 35506 shall include all powers or procedures either necessary, useful or desirable to carry out the powers and purposes of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1964, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

35509.

In the event that the boundaries of any district, which is authorized to exercise the powers granted by this article, are altered pursuant to the District Reorganization Act of 1965, Division 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 6 of the Government Code, such powers may continue to be exercised only within that portion of the district originally authorized to exercise such powers, when provided by terms and conditions adopted pursuant to Section 56470 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 313.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.2. Provisions Pertaining Only to the Lost Hills Water District [35520. - 35520.46.]

35520.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply only to the Lost Hills Water District. The powers provided in this chapter shall be in addition to any existing powers the district may have in relation to drainage and disposal of drain water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.1.

A district may acquire, construct, operate, and furnish facilities for the control of waters to protect, maintain, and enhance the quality of lands within the district, including drainage, disposal of drainage water and water of deleterious quality, and conservation and beneficial use of flood, storm, and other waste waters occurring on the lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.2.

If a district determines to exercise the powers granted by this chapter, the district shall prepare and adopt a plan of works and an estimate of the amount of money necessary to be raised for the implementation of the plan of works. The estimate shall include contingencies, bond issuing expenses, provision for a reserve for bond discount not in excess of 10 percent of the total amount of the assessment, provision for a bond reserve not in excess of 15 percent of the total amount of the assessment, all expenses estimated to be incurred in complying with the procedures required by this chapter, cost of acquisition of land and rights of way, construction costs, provision for inflation, and all other costs properly chargeable to the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.3.

In order to carry out the powers and purposes granted under this chapter, a district may exercise or use any of the powers or procedures otherwise granted to a district under this division to the extent the powers or procedures may be made applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.4.

The powers or procedures referred to in Section 35520.3 includes, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) Bonds issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 35950), Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 36150), and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 36300) of Part 6.

(b) Warrants issued pursuant to Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 36400) of Part 6.

(c) The formation of improvement districts and bonds therefor pursuant to Chapter 4.9 (commencing with Section 36410) and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 36450) of Part 6.

(d) The acquisition of property pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 35600) of Chapter 3.

(e) Contracts with other agencies pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 35850).

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.5.

The powers and procedures referred to in Section 35520.3 shall include all powers or procedures necessary, useful, or desirable to carry out the powers and purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the board may determine to issue bonds secured by benefit assessments, in which event the board shall define and determine a drainage service area which may be the entire district or any lesser portion thereof that will be benefited by the project.

The service area shall be designated “Drainage Service Area No. ____ of ____ Water District.” The service area may be subdivided by the board into separate zones or subareas that benefit solely from separate components of the total project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.   Effective May 31, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

35520.7.
